North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-28 Dentists
43-28-18.2.
Disciplinary procedure.

A person may file a written and signed complaint with the board alleging a dentist engaged in conduct identified as grounds for disciplinary action under section 43-28-18. The board may also initiate a complaint and investigation on the board’s motion.

The board may direct a complaint committee to investigate a complaint and recommend whether the board should initiate a disciplinary action against the dentist.

The board or complaint committee shall notify the dentist of the complaint, and require a written response from the dentist. The board or complaint committee may examine and copy records, including patient records, examine witnesses, obtain expert opinions, require the dentist to be physically or mentally examined, or both, by qualified professionals selected by the board, and take any other action necessary to investigate the complaint. A request by the board or complaint committee is authorized to disclose patient information and records to the board or complaint committee. Patient information and records disclosed to the board or complaint committee are confidential. The dentist shall cooperate with the board or the complaint committee in the investigation, including responding promptly and completely to a request or requirement.

The complaint, response, and any record received by the board in investigating the complaint are exempt records, as defined in section 44-04-17.1, until the board determines to proceed with a disciplinary action.

The board shall determine if there is a reasonable basis to believe the dentist engaged in conduct identified as grounds for disciplinary action under section 43-28-18. If the board determines there is not a reasonable basis to believe, the board shall notify the complainant and the dentist. If the board determines there is a reasonable basis to believe, the board shall proceed with a disciplinary action in accordance with chapter 28-32.

The board, at any time, may offer or accept a proposal for informal resolution of the complaint or disciplinary action.

The board may impose a fee on the dentist for all or part of the costs of an action resulting in discipline, including administrative costs, investigation costs, attorney’s fees, witness fees, the cost of the office of administrative hearings’ services, and court costs.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 369, § 27.

43-28-18.3.
Temporary suspension — Appeal.

When, based on verified evidence, the board determines by a clear and convincing standard that the evidence presented to the board indicates that the continued practice by the dentist would create a significant risk of serious and ongoing harm to the public while a disciplinary proceeding is pending, and that immediate suspension of the dentist’s license is required to reasonably protect the public from that risk of harm, the board may order a temporary suspension ex parte. For purposes of this section, “verified evidence” means testimony taken under oath and based on personal knowledge. The board shall give prompt written notice of the suspension to the dentist, which must include a copy of the order and complaint, the date set for a full hearing, and a specific description of the nature of the evidence, including a list of all known witnesses and a description of any documents relied upon by the board in ordering the temporary suspension which, upon request, must be made available to the dentist.

An ex parte temporary suspension remains in effect until a final order is issued after a full hearing or appeal under this section or until the suspension is otherwise terminated by the board.

The board shall conduct a hearing on the merits of the allegations to determine what disciplinary action, if any, must be taken against the dentist who is the subject of the ex parte suspension. That hearing must be held not later than thirty days from the issuance of the ex parte temporary suspension order. The dentist is entitled to a continuance of the thirty-day period upon request for a period determined by the hearing officer.

The dentist may appeal the ex parte temporary suspension order before the full hearing. For purposes of appeal, the district court shall decide whether the board acted reasonably or arbitrarily. The court shall give priority to the appeal for prompt disposition.

A dental or medical record of a patient, or other document containing personal information relating to a patient, which is obtained by the board is confidential.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 369, § 28.

43-28-19.
Revocation of license and certificate — Proceedings, how initiated — Service of notice and hearing. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 369, § 31.

43-28-20.
Plea — Answer — Trial of issues — Witnesses and cost. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 369, § 31.

43-28-21.
Determination — Order — Appeal and review. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 369, § 31.

43-28-22.
Reinstatement of license — Renewal of certificate — When issued — Fees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 369, § 31.

43-28-23.
Notice to board of change of address.

Within thirty days after a licensed and registered dentist changes the dentist’s place of business, the dentist shall notify the executive director of the board of the new address. The notice must be given by certified mail and return receipt requested. Such licensed and registered dentist may not practice dentistry in the state for more than thirty days after such removal without giving such notice.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 319, § 23; 1985, ch. 487, § 10; 1995, ch. 409, § 14.

43-28-24.
Duplicate license and certificate — When issued — Fee.

If a license or certificate of registration to practice dentistry in this state is lost or destroyed, the board shall issue and deliver a duplicate license or certificate for a fee established by rule.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 319, § 24; 1971, ch. 443, § 11; 1981, ch. 445, § 13; 1991, ch. 465, § 21; 2009, ch. 369, § 29.

43-28-25.
Unlawful acts — Penalty.

It is a class A misdemeanor:

For any unlicensed person to construct, alter, repair, or duplicate any denture, partial denture, bridge, splint, or orthodontic or prosthetic appliance, except as provided by rule adopted by the board.

For any person:

To falsely claim or pretend to be a graduate from any dental college or the holder of any diploma or degree from such college;

To practice any fraud and deceit either in obtaining a license or a certificate of registration;

To falsely claim or pretend to have or hold a license or certificate of registration from the board to practice dentistry; or

To practice dentistry in this state without a license and certificate of registration.

For any person, except a dentist, to own more than forty-nine percent of an office practice or business at which the practice of dentistry is performed. This provision does not apply to a board-approved medical clinic, hospital, or public health setting with which a dentist is associated; a board-approved nonprofit organization created to serve the dental needs of an underserved population; or the heir or personal representative of a deceased dentist. The board may inspect and approve a medical clinic, hospital, public health setting, or nonprofit organization at which the practice of dentistry is performed. The heir or personal representative may operate an office under the name of the deceased dentist for a period of not longer than two years from the date of the dentist’s death.

The board may institute a civil action for an injunction prohibiting violations of this section without proof that anyone suffered actual damages.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 319, § 25; 1975, ch. 106, § 501; 1995, ch. 414, § 1; 2001, ch. 380, § 11; 2005, ch. 366, § 1; 2009, ch. 369, § 30; 2013, ch. 328, § 6.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses; penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

Violation of dental hygiene chapter a class B misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 43-20-09.

43-28-25.1.
Prohibition — Waivers.

A dentist practicing dentistry may not require a patient to sign a form or statement waiving the patient’s right to file a complaint against the dentist with an appropriate state entity or shielding the dentist from liability for injury resulting from a dental encounter.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 318, § 5, effective August 1, 2021.

43-28-26.
Punishment for misdemeanors. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

43-28-27.
Fees.

All license fees, registration fees, and other fees authorized to be assessed and collected by the board must be established by rules adopted by the board.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 465, § 22.